nl: Hoofdbescherming band configuratie: 2 banden; 3 banden; 4 banden; 5 banden; Overig
ro-RO: Configurația curelei pentru cască: Cu 2 curele; Cu 3 curele; Cu 4 curele; Cu 5 curele; Altele
ru: Конфигурация ремней шлема: 2 ремня; 3 ремня; 4 ремня; 5 ремней; Другое
el: Διαμόρφωση ιμάντα προστατευτικής κάσκας πάλης: Με 2 λουράκια; Με 3 λουράκια; Με 4 λουράκια; Με 5 λουράκια; Άλλο
sk-SK: Konfigurácia popruhov prilby: 2 popruhy; 3 popruhy; 4 popruhy; 5 popruhov; Iné
cs: Rozmístění řemínků chrániče uší: 2 popruhy; 3 popruhy; 4 popruhy; 5 popruhů; Jiné
es: Configuración de correas del casco: 2 correas; 3 correas; 4 correas; 5 correas; Otro
fi: Päähineiden hihnojen kokoonpano: 2-hihnainen; 3-hihnainen; 4-hihnainen; 5-hihnainen; Muu
lt-LT: Galvos apsaugos dirželių konfigūracija: 2 dirželiai; 3 dirželiai; 4 dirželiai; 5 dirželiai; Kita
zh-TW: 頭部護具綁帶配置: 2 條綁帶; 3 條綁帶; 4 條綁帶; 5 條綁帶; 其他
tr: Başlık kayışı yapılandırması: 2 kayışlı; 3 kayışlı; 4 kayışlı; 5 kayışlı; Diğer
pl: Konfiguracja pasków ochraniacza głowy: 2-paskowy; 3-paskowy; 4-paskowy; 5-paskowy; Inna
fr: Configuration des sangles du casque: 2 sangles; 3 sangles; 4 sangles; 5 sangles; Autre
hu: Fejfedő-rögzítés kialakítása: 2 pántos; 3 pántos; 4 pántos; 5 pántos; Egyéb
pt-BR: Configuração das tiras do protetor de cabeça: 2 tiras; 3 tiras; 4 tiras; 5 tiras; Outra
th: การกำหนดรูปแบบสายรัดหมวก: สายรัด 2 เส้น; สายรัด 3 เส้น; สายรัด 4 เส้น; สายรัด 5 เส้น; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Konfiguracija remena za pokrivalo za glavu: 2 remena; 3 remena; 4 remena; 5 remena; Ostalo
sv: Remkonfiguration för hjälm: 2-remmars; 3-remmars; 4-remmars; 5-remmars; Övrigt
en: Headgear strap configuration: 2-strap; 3-strap; 4-strap; 5-strap; Other
zh-CN: 头盔绑带配置: 2 带式; 3 带式; 4 带式; 5 带式; 其他
pt-PT: Configuração da correia do capacete: 2 alças; 3 alças; 4 alças; 5 alças; Outra
da: Stroppens konfiguration på hovedbeklædning: 2-strop; 3-strop; 4-strop; 5-strop; Andet
it: Configurazione del cinturino del copricapo: 2 cinghie; 3 cinghie; 4 cinghie; 5 cinghie; Altro
de: Konfiguration der Kopfschutzriemen: 2-Riemen; 3-Riemen; 4-Riemen; 5-Riemen; Sonstige
ko: 머리 보호대 스트랩 구성: 2-스트랩; 3-스트랩; 4-스트랩; 5-스트랩; 기타
bg-BG: Конфигурация на каишките на предпазителя за глава: С 2 каишки; С 3 каишки; С 4 каишки; С 5 каишки; Други
sl-SI: Konfiguracija trakov zaščitne čelade/pokrivala: 2 trakova; 3 trakovi; 4 trakovi; 5 trakov; Drugo
nb: Konfigurasjon av hodestroppen: 2-stropp; 3-stropp; 4-stropp; 5-stropp; Annet
ja: ヘッドギアストラップの構成: 2ストラップ; 3ストラップ; 4ストラップ; 5ストラップ; その他
vi: Cấu hình dây đeo mũ bảo hiểm: 2 dây đeo; 3 dây đeo; 4 dây đeo; 5 dây đeo; Khác